Kentucky statutes. TITLE XL Crimes and Punishments
Community Residential Correctional Centers

439.580.
Definitions for KRS 439.590 to 439.630.

As used in KRS

439.590

to

439.630

, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Secretary” means the secretary of the Justice and Public Safety Cabinet;

“Commissioner” means the commissioner of the Department of Corrections;

“Department” means the Department of Corrections;

“Facility” means the community correctional center; and

“Relative” means a spouse; child, including stepchild, adopted child, or child as to whom the prisoner, though not a biological parent, has acted in the place of a parent; parent including a person who, though not a biological parent, has acted in the place of a parent; brother; sister; or grandparents.

History.

Enact. Acts 1972, ch. 293, § 1; 1974, ch. 74, Art. V, § 24(14); 1974, ch. 308, § 63; 1982, ch. 344, § 53, effective July 15, 1982; 1992, ch. 211, § 101, effective July 14, 1992; 2007, ch. 85, § 322, effective June 26, 2007.

439.590.
Community residential correctional centers.

The Department of Corrections may establish community residential correctional centers at locations approved by the legislative body of the area where located as places of confinement for convicted felons. The commissioner, or a person the commissioner delegates, may, at his own discretion, transfer prisoners to a residential center from any correctional institution for the purpose of facilitating the rehabilitation of the prisoner except as set out in KRS

439.620

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1972, ch. 293, § 2; 1974, ch. 74, Art. V, § 24(14); 1982, ch. 344, § 54, effective July 15, 1982; 1992, ch. 211, § 102, effective July 14, 1992.

439.600.
Extension of limits of place of confinement — Conditions.

The commissioner, or a person he delegates, may extend the limits of the place of confinement of a prisoner if there is reasonable cause to believe the prisoner will honor his trust, by authorizing him, under prescribed conditions, to:

Visit specifically designated places within the boundaries of Kentucky for a period not to exceed seven (7) days and return to the same institution or facility. An extension of limits may be granted only to permit a visit to a dying relative, attendance at the funeral of a relative, the contacting of prospective employers, or for any other compelling reason consistent with the public interest, or to promote the welfare and rehabilitation of the inmate; or

Be transferred to a medical facility outside the correctional facility for a period of time as required to receive necessary medical services not available in the institution; or

Participate in an educational training program in the community on a voluntary basis while continuing as a prisoner of the institution or facility to which he is committed or confined; or

To do work at paid employment in the community on a voluntary basis returning to the institution or to the facility at night.

A prisoner authorized to work at paid employment in the community under the provision of this subsection shall surrender to the commissioner of the department, or his designate, his earnings, less standard payroll deductions required by law. After deducting from the earning of each prisoner an amount determined to be the cost of the prisoner’s keep and confinement, which sum shall be deposited in the Kentucky State Treasury as trust and agency receipts at the place of confinement of the inmate, the commissioner of the department, or his designate shall:

Allow the prisoner to draw from the balance a reasonable sum to cover his incidental expenses;

Retain to the prisoner’s credit an amount deemed necessary to accumulate a reasonable sum to be paid to him on his release from prison;

Cause to be paid any additional balance as is needed for the support of the prisoner’s dependents.

History.

Enact. Acts 1972, ch. 293, § 3; 1982, ch. 344, § 55, effective July 15, 1982; 1992, ch. 211, § 103, effective July 14, 1992.

439.610.
Conduct constituting escape from custody.

The willful failure of a prisoner to remain within the extended limits of his confinement, or to return within the time prescribed to an institution or facility to which he was committed or transferred to after commitment, constitutes an escape from custody punishable as provided in KRS

520.030

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1972, ch. 293, § 4; 1974, ch. 406, § 335.

439.620.
Employment for prisoner — Considerations in securing.

Before securing employment for any prisoner under the provisions of KRS

439.600

, the commissioner shall determine:

That the paid employment will not result in the displacement of employed workers, or be applied in skills, crafts, or trades in which there is a surplus of available gainful labor in the locality, or impair existing contracts for services; and

That the rates of pay or other conditions of employment will not be less than those paid or provided for work of similar nature in the locality in which the work is performed.

History.

Enact. Acts 1972, ch. 293, § 5; 1982, ch. 344, § 56, effective July 15, 1982; 1992, ch. 211, § 104, effective July 14, 1992.

439.630.
Scope of commissioner’s authority.

The authority conferred upon the commissioner, or the person the commissioner delegates, to extend the limits of confinement of a prisoner or to grant furloughs by KRS

439.580

to

439.630

, extends to all persons committed to any correctional institution or facility.

History.

Enact. Acts 1972, ch. 293, § 6; 1982, ch. 344, § 57, effective July 15, 1982; 1992, ch. 211, § 105, effective July 14, 1992.